Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1206
Department; receive gifts, grants, loans, contributions, and other funds; conditions.

The department may receive, contract for, or apply for and receive gifts, grants, loans, contributions, and other funds from the federal or state government or from any public or private sources for the purpose of carrying out the Nebraska Public Transportation Act. Any contract between the department and the federal government entered into pursuant to this section may include all reasonable and appropriate conditions imposed by federal law or regulation which are not inconsistent with the purposes of the act.

Laws 1975, LB 443, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-3906;

Laws 1993, LB 158, § 5.